Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Chapter 27

Respiratory Care Practitioner Act

63-27-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Respiratory Care Practitioner Act.”

Acts 1986, ch. 610, § 1; T.C.A. § 63-6-401; Acts 1998, ch. 1106, § 55.

63-27-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Board” means the board of respiratory care;

“Certified respiratory therapist” means any person who has obtained the credential “certified respiratory therapist” (CRT) or the credential “certified respiratory therapy technician” (CRTT) from the National Board for Respiratory Care;

“Division” means the division of health related boards as defined by § 68-1-101;

“Practice of respiratory care” means, under the supervision, control and responsibility of a licensed physician, the therapy, management, education and instruction, rehabilitation, diagnostic testing evaluation, and care of patients with deficiencies and abnormalities that affect the cardiorespiratory system and associated aspects of other system functions. “Practice of respiratory care” also means, under the supervision, control and responsibility of a licensed physician, the performance of cardiorespiratory research, cardiorespiratory health promotion and disease prevention, and community wellness and education programs. “Practice of respiratory care” includes, under the supervision, control and responsibility of a licensed physician:

The administration of pharmacologic agents and medical gasses necessary to diagnose, implement treatment, promote disease prevention, and provide rehabilitation to the cardiorespiratory system. In no event, however, shall a respiratory care practitioner prescribe controlled substances of any kind;

The performance of specific diagnostic and testing techniques employed in the medical management of patients to assist in diagnosis, patient and family education, monitoring, treatment, maintenance of patient health status, and cardiorespiratory research including, but not limited to, pulmonary function testing, hemodynamic and physiologic monitoring and diagnosis of cardiac function, and specimen collection and analysis;

The establishment and maintenance of the airways, bronchopulmonary hygiene, and cardiopulmonary resuscitation, and cardiac and respiratory life support; and

The receipt and implementation of written and verbal physician orders and the development and implementation of care plans and protocols;

The practice of respiratory care may be performed in an inpatient or outpatient setting, clinic, hospital, nursing home facility, private dwelling, or other place deemed appropriate or necessary;

Registered respiratory therapists, certified respiratory therapists, and respiratory assistants who have been issued a license or certificate by the board, pursuant to the authority of § 63-27-104(a)(1), shall be exempt from any licensing, certification or permit requirements of the Tennessee Medical Laboratory Act, compiled in title 68, chapter 29, as amended, for medical laboratory personnel or medical laboratory trainees insofar as they engage in performing blood gases and PH analyses;

“Registered respiratory therapist” means any person who has obtained the credential “registered respiratory therapist” (RRT) from the National Board for Respiratory Care;

“Respiratory assistant” or “assistant” means any person certified as such pursuant to this chapter, who has:

Received on-the-job training equivalent to at least one thousand (1,000) hours of clinical training in respiratory care, during an eighteen (18) consecutive month period; provided, that such training shall have been received under supervision of either a:

Registered respiratory therapist;

Certified respiratory therapist; or

Licensed physician experienced in respiratory care; and

Passed a board-approved examination for respiratory assistants. The National Board for Respiratory Care (NBRC) entry level examination, as provided to the board by the NBRC, by contract, is the examination accepted by the board. This examination will not grant the respiratory assistant the NBRC credential. In addition, the board reserves the right to write its own state board examination or contract with other national testing organizations; and

“Respiratory care practitioner” means a registered respiratory therapist, a certified respiratory therapist, or a respiratory assistant licensed under this chapter.

Acts 1986, ch. 610, § 1; 1987, ch. 192, §§ 12, 13; T.C.A., § 63-6-402; Acts 1998, ch. 1106, §§ 1-4, 25-30, 50, 55; 2000, ch. 621, §§ 1-3; 2002, ch. 662, § 1.

63-27-103. Board of respiratory care.

A board is created, which shall be known as the board of respiratory care. This board shall consist of eight (8) members, who shall be appointed by the governor in the manner and for the terms of office as provided in this section.

The board shall be composed of four (4) members who are respiratory care practitioners holding a credential from the National Board for Respiratory Care, at least two (2) of whom shall be registered respiratory therapists; one (1) member who is a currently practicing physician having expertise in pulmonary medicine; one (1) member who is a hospital administrator; one (1) member who is a hospital employee licensed as a registered respiratory therapist; and one (1) citizen member who is not commercially or professionally associated with the health care field.

Each member of the board shall:

Be a resident of Tennessee for at least one (1) year immediately preceding appointment and during the member's term;

Be currently licensed in good standing in Tennessee, in the case of a professional member; and

Have had at least three (3) years of experience in that profession (in the case of a professional member).

The governor may consider for appointment to the board the names of qualified persons recommended by interested respiratory care groups, including, but not limited to, the professional organizations for each profession represented on the board. The Tennessee Society for Respiratory Care may submit a list of three (3) names for each position to be filled by a respiratory care practitioner. The Tennessee Medical Association may submit a list of three (3) names for the position to be filled by a physician having expertise in pulmonary medicine. The Tennessee Hospital Association (THA), an association of hospitals and health systems, may submit a list of three (3) names for the position to be filled by a hospital administrator and a list of three (3) names for the position to be filled by a hospital employee licensed as a registered respiratory therapist. The governor shall consult with the interested respiratory care groups to determine qualified persons to fill the positions.

Each member shall serve a term of three (3) years, except that initially the members of the council on respiratory care shall become members of the board and shall remain members of the board until their terms on the council on respiratory care would have expired. The governor shall stagger the terms of the remaining members appointed to the board, so that the terms of either two (2) or three (3) members shall expire each year. A vacancy occurring on the board shall be filled by the board itself for the unexpired term of that member. At or before the expiration of a member's term, an organization named in subsection (d) may submit three (3) names to the governor for appointment to that position. Each member shall serve until a successor is appointed. Members are eligible for reappointment to successive terms.

In making appointments to the board, the governor shall strive to ensure that at least one (1) member is sixty (60) years of age or older, that at least one (1) member is a member of a racial minority, and that the gender balance of the board reflects the gender balance of the state's population.

Each member shall be reimbursed for actual expenses incurred in the performance of official duties on the board, and in addition thereto, shall be entitled to a per diem of fifty dollars ($50.00) for each day's services in conducting the business of the board. All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Annually, the board shall choose a chair and a secretary from among its members.

The board shall hold at least one (1) regular meeting each year and such other meetings as the board determines necessary to conduct its business.

A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. No action of the board shall be valid unless approved by a majority of members present at a meeting at which there is a quorum.

The governor has the power to remove from office any member of the board for neglect of duties required by this chapter, for malfeasance in office, for incompetence, or for unprofessional conduct.

The board shall deposit all moneys received by the board into the state treasury, and the department shall make such allotments out of the board's account in the general fund as the department deems proper for the necessary expenses of the board.

The division shall provide administrative, investigatory, and clerical services to the board as are necessary to implement and enforce this chapter.

On and after January 1, 1999, the board shall assume and fulfill all powers and duties heretofore assigned to the council on respiratory care and the board of medical examiners, and the rules heretofore adopted by the council on respiratory care and the board of medical examiners shall become the rules of the board on January 1, 1999, without further action by the board. The board shall consult with respiratory care professional organizations in the development of any additional regulations.

Acts 1986, ch. 610, § 1; 1988, ch. 1013, § 44; 1993, ch. 86, § 1; T.C.A. § 63-6-403; Acts 1998, ch. 1106, §§ 24, 28, 29, 55; 2000, ch. 621, § 3; 2012, ch. 630, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. The board of respiratory care, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2022. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-243.

63-27-104. Powers of board.

In addition to the powers elsewhere in this chapter, the board has the duty to:

Promulgate, in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, all rules that are reasonably necessary for the performance of the various duties imposed upon the board by this chapter. Except as otherwise specifically provided by this subdivision (a)(1)(A), all rules relating exclusively to registered respiratory therapists, certified respiratory therapists or respiratory assistants shall be initiated and adopted by a majority of the members of the board. Subject to the limitations contained in this section, all rulemaking authority delegated by this chapter shall be vested in the board. The board shall conduct at least one (1) public hearing each year, and shall undertake such other activities as shall be reasonably necessary, to solicit comments from license and certificate holders and the public concerning policies of the board relating to respiratory care, as well as any problems existing within the practice of respiratory care that may affect the public;

Within the maximum limitations established elsewhere in this chapter, fees relating to the practice of respiratory care shall be set by the board in an amount sufficient to pay all of the expenses of the board;

Issue, under the board's name, all licenses approved by the board and to maintain a registry of all license holders. It is the duty of the board to review and approve the qualifications of applicants for licensure or renewal as registered respiratory therapists, certified respiratory therapists or respiratory assistants. The board may limit, restrict, or impose one (1) or more conditions on a license at the time it is issued, renewed, reactivated, or reinstated; and

Collect or receive all fees, fines and moneys owed pursuant to this chapter and to pay the same into the general fund of the state.

The board is authorized to issue advisory private letter rulings to any person licensed under this chapter who makes such a request regarding any matters within the board's primary jurisdiction. Such private letter ruling shall affect only the licensee making such inquiry and shall have no precedential value for any other inquiry or future contested case to come before the board. Any dispute regarding a private letter ruling may, if the board chooses to do so, be resolved pursuant to the declaratory order provisions of § 4-5-223.

Acts 1986, ch. 610, § 1; T.C.A. § 63-6-404; Acts 1998, ch. 1106, §§ 5-7, 27-29, 31, 32, 55; 2000, ch. 621, §§ 2-5.

63-27-105. Practice of respiratory care — License renewal.

In order to safeguard life, health and property and promote public welfare by requiring that only properly qualified persons shall practice respiratory care in this state, any person practicing respiratory care shall be licensed as provided in this chapter, and it is unlawful for any person to practice or offer to practice respiratory care unless such person has been duly licensed under this chapter, except as provided in this section.

A person seeking licensure as a registered respiratory therapist or a certified respiratory therapist must be at least eighteen (18) years of age and of good moral character, must pay the required fees set by the board, and must meet the requirements of subdivisions (b)(1)(A) or (b)(1)(B):

A person applying for licensure as a registered respiratory therapist shall provide evidence satisfactory to the board that such person has successfully completed a respiratory care educational program accredited by the Commission on Accreditation of Allied Health Education Programs (CAAHEP) in collaboration with the Committee on Accreditation for Respiratory Care (CoARC), or their successor organizations, and has successfully passed the National Board for Respiratory Care registry examination for advanced respiratory therapists; and

A person applying for licensure as a certified respiratory therapist shall provide evidence satisfactory to the board that the person has successfully completed a respiratory care educational program accredited by the CAAHEP in collaboration with the CoARC, or their successor organizations, and has successfully passed the National Board for Respiratory Care certification examination for entry level respiratory therapists.

After January 1, 2000, no person may be licensed as a respiratory assistant if that person has not been previously licensed as a respiratory assistant in Tennessee. However, persons who have been licensed as respiratory assistants may continue to renew their licenses indefinitely so long as they meet all the requirements for renewal.

Each respiratory care practitioner licensed pursuant to this chapter shall biennially apply to the board for renewal of the license and shall pay a renewal fee set by the board. A respiratory care practitioner who fails to renew the license by the date of expiration of the license shall not continue to practice respiratory care in the state.

A respiratory care practitioner who fails to timely renew the license may seek reinstatement of the license from the board. The board may reinstate the license upon good cause shown, upon payment of all past due renewal fees and a late renewal fee, and upon compliance with any other reasonable conditions imposed by the board.

A person licensed to practice as a certified respiratory therapist may upgrade the license to registered respiratory therapist if the person furnishes evidence satisfactory to the board that the person meets all the requirements to be licensed as a registered respiratory therapist. A person licensed to practice as a respiratory assistant may upgrade the license to certified respiratory therapist or registered respiratory therapist if the person furnishes evidence satisfactory to the board that the person meets all the requirements to be licensed as a certified respiratory therapist or registered respiratory therapist. A person may not hold more than one (1) Tennessee license to practice respiratory care at the same time.

Acts 1986, ch. 610, § 1; 1989, ch. 360, §§ 25, 26; 1989, ch. 523, § 50; T.C.A. § 63-6-405; Acts 1998, ch. 1106, §§ 8, 27-29, 33, 34, 44-46, 55; 2000, ch. 621, §§ 2, 3; 2002, ch. 662, §§ 2, 3.

Cross-References. Individuals applying for certification between July 1, 1986 and June 30, 1987, § 63-27-113.

Licensure, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1- 112.

63-27-106. Registered respiratory therapist.

The knowledge and skills for performing the functions of a registered respiratory therapist shall be acquired by academic and clinical preparation in a respiratory care program approved by the Commission on Accreditation of Allied Health Education Programs (CAAHEP) or its successor organization or other accrediting organization recognized by the board or by registry from the National Board for Respiratory Care. Registered respiratory therapists may assume primary clinical responsibility for all respiratory care modalities. Such modalities shall include, but are not limited to, accepting telephone and verbal orders and responsibilities involving the supervision of certified respiratory therapists and respiratory assistants.

Under the supervision of a physician, a registered respiratory therapist may be required to exercise considerable independent clinical judgment in the respiratory care of patients. The registered respiratory therapist must also be capable of serving as a technical resource person to the physician regarding current practices in respiratory care and to the hospital staff regarding effective and safe methods for administering respiratory care.

Acts 1986, ch. 610, § 1; 1987, ch. 192, § 1; T.C.A. § 63-6-406; Acts 1998, ch. 1106, §§ 27-29, 53, 55; 2000, ch. 621, §§ 2, 3.

Cross-References. Applicants for certification between July 1, 1986 and June 30, 1987, § 63-27-113.

63-27-107. Certified respiratory therapist.

The knowledge and skills for performing the functions of a certified respiratory therapist shall be acquired by academic and clinical preparation in a respiratory care program approved by the Commission on Accreditation of Allied Health Education Programs (CAAHEP) or its successor organization or other accrediting organization recognized by the board or by certification from the National Board for Respiratory Care. Under the supervision of a physician, certified respiratory therapists may assume clinical responsibility for specified respiratory care modalities involving the application of well-defined therapeutic techniques.

The certified respiratory therapist's role shall not require the exercising of independent, clinical judgment; however, the certified respiratory therapist may be expected to adjust or modify therapeutic techniques within well-defined procedures based on a limited range of patient responses. Therefore, the effective use of the certified respiratory therapist, especially in the critical care setting, shall require the supervision of a physician experienced in respiratory care. The certified respiratory therapist may accept telephone or verbal orders and responsibilities involving the supervision of respiratory care therapists and respiratory assistants.

Acts 1986, ch. 610, § 1; 1987, ch. 192, § 2; T.C.A. § 63-6-407; Acts 1998, ch. 1106, §§ 28, 53, 55; 2000, ch. 621, § 2.

Cross-References. Applicants for certification between July 1, 1986 and June 30, 1987, § 63-27-113.

63-27-108. Respiratory assistants.

The knowledge and skills for performing the functions of a respiratory assistant shall be acquired through compliance with the requirements of § 63-27-102(4).

The assistant's role shall not include the exercising of independent, clinical judgment. The assistant may be expected to adjust or modify therapeutic techniques within well-defined procedures based on a limited range of patient responses. Therefore, the use of the assistant requires the supervision of a registered respiratory therapist, certified respiratory therapist, or physician experienced in respiratory care. No assistant shall be permitted to perform the functions for which the assistant is certified on a critical care patient being maintained on mechanical ventilation, unless the assistant possesses a certificate that indicates the assistant has passed the critical care section of the board approved examination for respiratory assistants.

Acts 1986, ch. 610, § 1; 1987, ch. 192, § 3; T.C.A. § 63-6-408; Acts 1998, ch. 1106, §§ 27-29, 55; 2000, ch. 621, §§ 2, 3.

Cross-References. Applicants for certification between July 1, 1986 and June 30, 1987, § 63-27-113.

63-27-109. Continuing education — Revocation of license — Retirement.

Every licensed respiratory care practitioner shall obtain, during each calendar year, at least ten (10) hours of continuing professional respiratory care education that meets the guidelines established for such continuing education by the rules of the board. Each licensed practitioner shall maintain written proof of obtaining such continuing education for a period of at least three (3) years and shall, upon request, make such proof available to the board or the division.

The board shall approve only those continuing education courses that conform with the guidelines established by the rules of the board. Providers of such courses shall also be approved by the board in accordance with guidelines established by the rules of the board. Course offerings approved for in-service training by the joint commission on accreditation of health care organizations and in-service training programs sponsored or conducted by the Tennessee Society of Respiratory Care shall be deemed to be approved courses.

The rules of the board may establish exceptions from the requirements of this section in emergency or hardship cases. Such cases shall be individually reviewed and approved by the board.

When any such person shall fail to renew that person's license and pay the renewal fee after renewal becomes due, the license of such person shall be automatically revoked without further notice or hearing unless renewal is made and all fees paid prior to the expiration of sixty (60) days from the date such renewal becomes due.

Any person licensed to practice by this chapter, who has retired or may hereafter retire from such practice in this state, shall not be made to register as required by this chapter if such person shall file with the board, an affidavit on a form to be furnished by the board, which affidavit shall state the date on which such person retired from such practice and such other facts as shall tend to verify such retirement as the board shall deem necessary. If such person thereafter reengages in such practice in this state, such person shall apply for registration with the board as provided by this chapter and shall meet other requirements as may be set by the board.

Acts 1986, ch. 610, § 1; 1987, ch. 192, § 14; 1993, ch. 86, §§ 5, 6; T.C.A. § 63-6-409; Acts 1998, ch. 1106, §§ 9-12, 35-37, 55; 2000, ch. 621, § 6.

Cross-References. Certification renewal of individuals applying for certification between July 1, 1986 and June 30, 1987, § 63-27-113.

Grounds for license denial, suspension or revocation, § 63-6-214.

Licensure, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1- 112.

63-27-110. Exemptions.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit:

Any person licensed or certified to practice any of the other health-related professions in this state under any other law from engaging in the practice for which such person is licensed or certified; or

Persons employed as subsidiary workers who do not represent themselves to be registered respiratory therapists, certified respiratory therapists or assistants from assisting in the respiratory care of patients under the direction and supervision of a licensed physician.

As used in this section, “subsidiary worker” means an individual who occasionally administers oxygen or other therapeutic gas under the orders of a licensed physician, osteopath or doctor of dentistry, and who is not involved in any other aspect of the direct delivery of respiratory care procedures or the administration of diagnostic tests of the cardio-respiratory function. “Subsidiary worker” does not include an individual who delivers and installs respiratory care equipment in hospitals, in the home and in alternate care sites.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to apply to a registered nurse or to a licensed practical nurse employed by a licensed nursing home when such person is under the supervision of a registered nurse or a licensed physician, and so long as such licensed practical nurse does not maintain and manage life support systems.

With respect to licensed health care professionals that lawfully engage in the practice of respiratory care within the scope of practice of their professions, the board may develop mechanisms and standards for ensuring the competency of such licensed professionals in their practice of respiratory care, and may recommend to the health-related board for each such profession that that board adopt, by rule or otherwise, mechanisms and standards for ensuring competency in the practice of respiratory care; provided, that the board has no authority to regulate a health care professional subject to regulation by another health-related board.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as prohibiting the practice of respiratory care by students while they are under the supervision of instructors in any respiratory care educational program that has been approved by the Commission on Accreditation of Allied Health Education Programs (CAAHEP), or its successor organization, so long as the students' activities are not performed for compensation and so long as the students wear an appropriate badge indicating their status as students.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit self-care by the patient or the gratuitous care by a friend or member of the family who does not represent or hold out to be a respiratory care practitioner certified under this chapter.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit an individual who holds a credential from the National Board for Respiratory Care entitled “certified pulmonary function technologist (CPFT)” or “registered pulmonary function technologist (RPFT)” from engaging in the performance of pulmonary function diagnostic testing.

Acts 1986, ch. 610, § 1; 1987, ch. 192, §§ 4-7; 1993, ch. 86, § 2; 1995, ch. 368, § 1; T.C.A. § 63-6-410; Acts 1998, ch. 1106, §§ 27, 29, 51, 52, 55, 58; 2000, ch. 621, §§ 3, 7, 8.

63-27-111. Prohibited practices — Criminal penalties.

No person shall by verbal claim, advertisement, letterhead, card, or in any other way, claim to be a registered respiratory therapist, certified respiratory therapist or respiratory assistant unless such person possesses a valid license issued pursuant to this chapter.

It is unlawful for any person to practice or offer to practice respiratory care unless such person has been duly licensed under this chapter, except as provided in § 63-27-110.

Each violation of this section is a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 1986, ch. 610, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1998, ch. 1106, §§ 27-29, 38, 39, 55; 2000, ch. 621, §§ 2, 3.

Code Commission Notes.

The misdemeanors in this section have been designated as Class A misdemeanors by authority of § 40-35-110, which provides that an offense designated a misdemeanor without specification as to category is a Class A misdemeanor. See also § 39-11-114.

Cross-References. Penalties, § 63-1-123.

Penalties for violation of statute, rule or order, recovery, § 63-1-134.

Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

63-27-112. Disciplinary sanctions — Complaints of violations — Civil penalties — Use of witnesses.

The board has the power to impose any of the disciplinary sanctions set forth in this section whenever the licensee is found guilty of violating this chapter or committing any of the following acts or offenses:

Making false or misleading statements or committing fraud in procuring a license;

Immoral, unethical, unprofessional or dishonorable conduct;

Habitual intoxication or personal misuse of narcotics, controlled substances, controlled substance analogues or any other drugs or the use of alcoholic beverages or stimulants in such manner as to adversely affect the person's ability to practice respiratory care;

Conviction of a felony or of any offense involving moral turpitude or of any violation of the drug laws of this state or of the United States;

Violation or attempted violation, directly or indirectly, assisting in or abetting the violation of, or conspiring to violate, any provision of this chapter or any lawful order of the board or any criminal statute of this state;

Gross health care liability, ignorance, negligence or incompetence in the course of professional practice;

Making or signing in one's professional capacity any document that is known to be false at the time it is made or signed;

Engaging in the practice of respiratory care when mentally or physically unable to safely do so;

Making false statements or representations or being guilty of fraud or deceit in the practice of respiratory care;

Having disciplinary action imposed by another state or territory of the United States for any acts or omissions that would constitute grounds for discipline of a person licensed to practice respiratory care in this state; provided, further, that a certified copy of the order or other document memorializing the disciplinary action by the other state or territory shall constitute prima facie evidence of a violation of this section; or

Any other unprofessional or unethical conduct specified in the rules of the board.

Complaints alleging violations of this chapter, or any rule duly promulgated pursuant to § 63-27-104, shall be filed with the board, shall be referred by the board to the division for investigation, and shall be resolved by the board in accordance with this chapter and the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. A file shall be maintained on each such complaint filed with the board and shall reflect all activities taken by the board and division in response to such complaint.

The board may impose one (1) or more of the following penalties for violations of this chapter or any rule duly promulgated pursuant to § 63-27-104:

Denial of an application for licensure;

Revocation or suspension of licensure;

Imposition of an administrative fine not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for each count or separate offense;

Placement of the certified respiratory therapist, respiratory assistant or registered respiratory therapist on probation for such length of time and subject to such conditions as the board may specify, including requiring the certified respiratory therapist, respiratory assistant or registered respiratory therapist to submit to treatment, to attend continuing education courses, or to work under the supervision of another certified respiratory therapist or registered respiratory therapist; or

Issuance of a reprimand.

The board shall be empowered to refuse to reinstate licensure or cause a license to be issued to a person it has deemed unqualified, until such time as it finds that such person has complied with all the terms and conditions set forth in the final order rendered pursuant to subsection (a) and that the respiratory assistant, certified respiratory therapist or registered respiratory therapist is capable of safely engaging in the delivery of respiratory care services.

The chair of the board has the authority to administer oaths to witnesses and, upon probable cause being established, to issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of documents and records.

An action taken under this section shall be subject to the applicable provisions of the Fresh Start Act that are compiled in chapter 1, part 1 of this title.

Acts 1986, ch. 610, § 1; 1987, ch. 192, § 8; T.C.A. § 63-6-412; Acts 1998, ch. 1106, §§ 13-15, 27-29, 40, 41, 55; 2000, ch. 621, §§ 2, 3, 9; 2002, ch. 662, §§ 4, 5; 2012, ch. 798, § 49; 2012, ch. 848, § 83; 2018, ch. 745, § 41.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added (f).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 745, § 46. July 1, 2018.

Cross-References. Grounds for license denial, suspension or revocation, § 63-6-214.

Licensure, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

Penalties, § 63-1-123.

Penalties for violation of statute, rule or order, recovery, § 63-1-134.

Attorney General Opinions. The board of respiratory care has authority to issue administrative subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses or the production of documents prior to the commencement of an administrative action, OAG 01-055, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 47 (4/10/01).

63-27-113. Required credentials for registered respiratory therapist.

Any person currently licensed as a registered respiratory therapist who has not obtained the credential “registered respiratory therapist (RRT)” from the National Board for Respiratory Care shall have until January 1, 2004, to obtain such credential in order to continue being licensed as a registered respiratory therapist in this state. If such person has not obtained such credential by January 1, 2004, such person's license shall be renewed as a certified respiratory therapist license when it is next renewed.

Acts 1986, ch. 610, § 1; 1987, ch. 192, § 11; T.C.A. § 63-6-413; Acts 1998, ch. 1106, §§ 16, 17, 27-29, 42, 55; 2000, ch. 621, §§ 2, 3; 2002, ch. 662, § 6.

Cross-References. Certification generally, § 63-27-105.

Certification renewal generally, § 63-27-109.

63-27-114. [Reserved.]

Blood gas analysis, and maintenance and quality assurance of a blood gas laboratory may not be performed by any practitioner licensed under this chapter unless:

In the case of a registered respiratory therapist or certified respiratory therapist, the registered respiratory therapist or certified respiratory therapist:

Has been trained in blood gas analysis as approved by the board;

Has been granted a license by the board bearing the endorsement “ABG analyst”; and

Holds either the NBRC credentials “CRT,” “CRTT” or “RRT” or has passed a board approved examination testing competency for blood gas analysis; and

In the case of a respiratory assistant:

Has been trained in blood gas analysis as approved by the board;

Has been granted a license by the board bearing the endorsement “ABG analyst”; and

Has passed a board approved examination testing competency for blood gas analysis. The National Board for Respiratory Care entry level examination, as provided to the board by the NBRC, by contract, is the examination accepted by the board. This examination will not grant the respiratory assistant the NBRC credential. In addition, the board reserves the right to write its own state council examination or contract with other national testing organizations.

Acts 1987, ch. 192, § 10; T.C.A. § 63-6-415; Acts 1998, ch. 1106, §§ 19, 20, 27-29, 43, 55; 2000, ch. 621, §§ 2, 3, 11; 2002, ch. 662, § 7.

63-27-116. Licenses for registered respiratory therapist and certified respiratory therapist — Temporary license — Reciprocity.

The board may issue a temporary license to an individual applicant who has completed the required respiratory care educational program but who has not yet successfully completed the NBRC examination. A temporary license shall automatically expire one (1) year from its date of issuance and may not be renewed.

The board may issue a license to practice respiratory care by endorsement to an applicant who is currently licensed to practice respiratory care under the laws of another state, territory or country if the qualifications of the applicant are deemed by the board to be equivalent to those required in this state.

The board may authorize any of its members or its consultant to conduct a review of the qualifications of an applicant for a license or temporary license to practice respiratory care in this state and to make an initial determination as to whether the applicant has met all the requirements for a license or temporary license. If the board member or board consultant determines that the applicant has met all the requirements for a license or temporary license, the applicant is then authorized to practice respiratory care in this state until the board makes a final decision on the application for a license or temporary license. The board may authorize the use of this procedure with respect to applicants for license renewal or reinstatement as well. In no event shall the temporary authorization issued pursuant to a determination made by the board member or board consultant be effective for longer than a six (6) month period measured from the date of issuance. This process shall not be utilized by the applicant more than once.

If temporary authorization, pursuant to this subsection (c), is issued to an applicant for a license to practice respiratory care in this state and if the subsequent decision of the board is to deny the application based upon a good faith determination that the applicant has not, in fact, complied with all the requirements for a license, then the doctrine of estoppel shall not apply against the state based upon its issuance of temporary authorization and its subsequent denial of licensure.

Acts 1993, ch. 86, § 3; 1996, ch. 738, § 1; T.C.A. § 63-6-416; Acts 1998, ch. 1106, §§ 21-23, 28, 29, 47, 49, 55; 2000, ch. 621, §§ 2, 3; 2002, ch. 662, § 8.

Cross-References. Licensure, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

63-27-117. Training for respiratory equipment delivery technicians.

As a part of its licensing and regulation of home medical equipment providers under § 68-11-226, the board for licensing health care facilities shall establish uniform standards to ensure the competency of persons who deliver and install respiratory equipment.

Acts 1993, ch. 86, § 4; T.C.A. § 63-6-417; Acts 1998, ch. 1106, §§ 28, 29, 54, 55.

63-27-115. Blood gas analysis — Performance of blood gas laboratory functions.